Hawaii, session 2026, HB2533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that teachers play an essential role in supporting children and youth during their formative years.  However, stress caused by excessive workloads and a lack of support have adversely affected teacher retention across the nation.  In the aftermath of the coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) pandemic, data has shown that seventy‑eight per cent of public school teachers have considered leaving their jobs due to these factors. Between the 2020 and 2024 academic years, about seventy-nine thousand teachers in the United States left their jobs, with forty-four per cent leaving teaching within their first five years of working in the field. Data has also shown that a substantial amount of teacher‑related stress is associated with assignments that have increased responsibilities that go beyond the teacher's ordinary duties, including administrative tasks, long working hours, and support for students' mental health. These impacts are persistent in Hawaii where, despite recent improvements in teacher retention, education officials remain concerned about long-term workforce stability.  The legislature further finds that other states, including California and New York, have adopted measures that recognize these increased duties and have helped to improve teacher retention. The legislature recognizes that in Hawaii, educational officers, principals, and vice principals with special responsibilities at special needs schools are statutorily required to be provided additional benefits pursuant to section 302A-631, Hawaii Revised Statutes.  However, teachers who similarly assume duties beyond their ordinary scope are not provided with the same benefits.  The legislature finds that this inequity between teachers and educational officers must be addressed. The legislature also recognizes the Hawaii supreme court's holding in Clarabal v. Department of Education, 145 Hawaii 69 (2019), that the State is required under Article X, section 4, of the state constitution to provide children with reasonable access to a Hawaiian language immersion education.  Teachers who instruct in Hawaiian language immersion must assume additional responsibilities, including advanced language proficiency, culturally grounded curriculum development, and the integration of traditional knowledge.  The legislature finds that teachers who assume these duties should similarly be afforded additional benefits. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to promote parity between educational officers and teachers by: (1)  Requiring the department of education to provide additional benefits to: (A)  Teachers with special assignments in which their duties and responsibilities are greater than their ordinary duties and responsibilities; (B)  Teachers in Hawaiian language medium education whose responsibilities are greater or unique and require additional language skills; and (C)  Teachers at special needs schools; and (2)  Appropriating moneys to the department of education. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-630, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-630 [[]Teachers; additional benefits or credits.[]]  (a) Teachers with special assignments, where their duties and responsibilities are greater[, may] than their ordinary duties and responsibilities, shall be provided additional benefits by the department. (b)  Teachers in Hawaiian language medium education whose responsibilities are greater or unique and require additional language skills [may] shall be provided additional benefits by the department. (c)  In determining additional benefits for vocational agriculture and technical school teachers, the department may allow credit for practical experience. (d)  In determining additional benefits for teachers, staff, and administrators in Hawaiian language medium education, the department may allow credit for practical experience. (e)  Teachers at special needs schools shall be provided additional benefits by the department pursuant to section 302A‑624.  As used in this subsection, "special needs schools" means those schools having a relatively large proportion of students exhibiting low performance, as indicated by factors such as low standardized achievement test scores, a high retention rate, and a low graduation rate for the area." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the provision of additional benefits to teachers pursuant to section 302A-630, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________